Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.080

Employment of experts, technicians.

The attorney general may employ such skilled experts, scientists, technicians, or other specially qualified persons as he or she deems necessary to aid him or her in the preparation or trial of actions or proceedings.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5050; 1965 c 8 s 43.10.080. Prior: 1941 c 50 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 11034-5.]